Tennessee, session 114, SB0546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-16-306(b), is amended by deleting
the language "and" in subdivision (1), by redesignating subdivision (2) as subdivision (3), and by
adding the following as a new subdivision (2):
(2) Completing a course of instruction concerning online notarization under
subsection (e) and passing an examination administered by the course provider; and
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-16-306(c)(7), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead the following:
(7) A certification that the applicant has reviewed, understands, and will comply
with the requirements of this part and the rules promulgated by the secretary of state
under this part.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-16-306, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection (e):
(e)
(1) The course of instruction on online notarization, as required under
subdivision (b)(2), must cover, at a minimum:
(A) Notarial laws;
(B) Technology procedures of online notarizations; and
(C) Ethical requirements for online notaries.
SB0546
001023
- 1 -

(2) The course of instruction on online notarization must be approved by
the secretary of state or the secretary of state's authorized representative or
designee.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001023